Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.125

On-site parole revocation hearing—Board's decision—Reinstatement or revocation of parole.

After the on-site parole revocation hearing for a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, has been concluded, the members of the board having heard the matter shall enter their decision of record within ten days, and make findings and conclusions upon the allegations of the violations of the conditions of parole. If the member, or members having heard the matter, should conclude that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole have not been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, or, those which have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence are not sufficient cause for the revocation of parole, then the parolee shall be reinstated on parole on the same or modified conditions of parole. For parole violations not resulting in new convictions, modified conditions of parole may include sanctions according to an administrative sanction grid. If the member or members having heard the matter should conclude that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence and constitute sufficient cause for the revocation of parole, then such member or members shall enter an order of parole revocation and return the parole violator to state custody. Within thirty days of the return of such parole violator to a state correctional institution the board shall enter an order determining a new minimum term not exceeding the maximum penalty provided by law for the crime for which the parole violator was originally convicted or the maximum fixed by the court.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 338; 1993 c 140 s 2; 1969 c 98 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.